Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.23
Manufactured home, defined.

Manufactured home
means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which in the traveling
mode is eight body feet or more in width or forty body feet or more in length
or when erected on site is three hundred twenty or more square feet and which
is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with
or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities
and includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems
contained in the structure, except that manufactured home includes any structure
that meets all of the requirements of this section other than the size requirements
and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification
required by the United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development and
complies with the standards established under the National Manufactured Housing
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., as
such act existed on January 1, 2010.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 35.